Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 11 Kosher Foods

26-2-330 through 26-2-335.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 114, § 2/HB 1345, effective May 20, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This article was based on Ga. L. 1980, p. 1767, § 1.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 114, § 1/HB 1345, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Kosher Food Consumer Protection Act.’ ”